Hawaii statutes.
§574-3 Children born to parents not married
to each other. The registrar of births shall register any child
born to parents not married to each other at the time of the child's birth and
where either the natural parents have not married each other or where the
parent and child relationship has not been established pursuant to chapter 584,
as having both a family name and given name chosen by the mother. [L 1860, p
32, §3; RL 1925, §3121; RL 1935, §4665; RL 1945, §12386; RL 1955, §327-3; am L
1967, c 6, §2; HRS §574-3; am L 1980, c 153, §2; am L 1989, c 75, §3; am L
1997, c 52, §6]

Cross References

Birth certificates, see §338-21.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next